Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-404
County and city bonds; publication required; resubmission limited.

Upon a majority of the votes cast being in favor of the proposition submitted, the county board, in the case of a county, and the city council, in the case of a city, shall cause the proposition and the result of the vote to be entered upon the records of said county or city, and a notice of its adoption to be published for two successive weeks in any newspaper in said county or city, if there be one, and if not, then without such publication; and shall thereupon issue said bonds, which shall be and continue a subsisting debt against such county or city until they are paid and discharged; Provided, that the question of bond issues in such county or city, when defeated, shall not be resubmitted in substance for a period of six months from and after the date of said election.

Laws 1869, § 4, p. 92;

R.S.1913, § 408;

C.S.1922, § 325;

Laws 1923, c. 69, § 1, p. 206;

C.S.1929, § 11-404;

R.S.1943, § 10-404;

Laws 1971, LB 534, § 2.

Section is specifically limited to counties and cities. Lang v. Sanitary District, 160 Neb. 754, 71 N.W.2d 608 (1955).

If notice is not published, bonds are void. Wilbur v. Wyatt, 63 Neb. 261, 88 N.W. 499 (1901).